Utah statutes.
58-5a-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
(1)  The division shall refuse to issue a license to an applicant and shall
refuse to renew or shall revoke, suspend, or place on probation the license of
a licensee who:
(a)  does not meet the qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure
under this chapter; or
(b)  is guilty of a crime which, when considered with the functions and duties
of a licensee under this chapter, demonstrates a threat or potential threat to
the public health, safety, or welfare.
(2)  The division may refuse to issue a license to an applicant and shall
refuse to renew or shall revoke, suspend, or place on probation the license of
a licensee who:
(a)  is guilty of unlawful conduct related to practice under this chapter or
unprofessional conduct as defined in this chapter, Section 58-1-501, or rules
made under either;
(b)  has obtained or attempted to obtain a license under this title by fraud
or willful misrepresentation; or
(c)  has had a license or certification to practice in any profession or
occupation subjected to disciplinary action which demonstrates a threat or
potential threat to the public health, safety, or welfare, when considered
with the activities regulated under this chapter.
